Hawaii statutes.
[§200-73] Unlawful to possess certain
vessels or hulls. No person shall possess a vessel or hull, knowing that
the vessel hull identification number, placed on the same by the manufacturer
or the owner for the purpose of identification, has been changed, altered,
erased, or mutilated for the purpose of changing the identity of the vessel or
hull thereof. Any vessel or hull from which the vessel hull identification
number carved, burned, stamped, embossed, or otherwise permanently affixed to
the hull by the manufacturer or by the owner, has been removed, defaced, or
altered shall be caused by the chairperson to be taken into custody and, if not
identified, disposed of pursuant to part III. If identified, the chairperson
shall:

(1) Notify the owner at the owner's last known
address or the address shown on the records of the department or United States
Coast Guard, and all lien holders who have properly filed a financing
statement, referencing the name of the registered owner, in the bureau of
conveyances or who are shown on the records of the department or United States
Coast Guard;

(2) Authorize restoration of the original vessel hull
identification number or if unknown, assign a new number; and

(3) Restore the vessel or hull to the owner upon
payment to the State of all costs and expenses incurred by the State causing
the vessel to be taken into custody. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next